fr: Type de finition de la figurine: Brillant; Peint à la main; Mat; Métallique; Nacré; Satiné/semi-brillant; Non peint; Vieilli; Autre
el: Τύπος φινιρίσματος φιγούρας: Γυαλιστερό; Ζωγραφισμένο στο χέρι; Ματ; Μεταλλικό; Περλέ; Σατινέ/ημιγυαλιστερό; Άβαφο; Με όψη φθοράς; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип покритие на фигурката: Гланц; Ръчно рисувана; Мат; Металик; Перлен; Сатен/полугланц; Небоядисана; Със състарен ефект; Други
nb: Figurfinishtype: Glans; Håndmalt; Matt; Metallisk; Perlemor; Sateng / halvblank; Umalt; Patinert; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta zaključka figure: Sijaj; Ročno poslikano; Mat; Kovinski; Biserni; Satenast / polsijajen; Nepobarvano; Postarano; Drugo
fi: Hahmon viimeistelyn tyyppi: Kiiltävä; Käsinmaalattu; Matta; Metallinhohtoinen; Helmiäishohtoinen; Satiini / puolikiiltävä; Maalaamaton; Patinoitu; Muu
zh-CN: 模型成品工艺类型: 光泽; 手绘; 哑光; 金属色; 珠光; 缎面/半光; 未上漆; 做旧; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de acabamento da figura: Brilhante; Pintado à mão; Opaco; Metálico; Perolado; Acetinado/semibrilhante; Não pintado; Desgastado; Outro
ru: Тип отделки поверхности фигурки: Глянцевое; Ручная роспись; Матовое; Металлик; Перламутровое; Сатиновое/полуглянцевое; Неокрашенное; Состаренное (с эффектом износа); Другое
es: Tipo de acabado de figura: Brillante; Pintado a mano; Mate; Metálico; Nacarado; Satinado/semibrillante; Sin pintar; Desgastado; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de finisaj al figurii: Lucios; Pictat manual; Mat; Metalizat; Sidefat; Satinat/Semilucios; Nepictat; Uzat (weathered); Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta završne obrade figure: Sjaj; Ručno obojeno; Mat; Metalik; Biserno; Saten / polusjajno; Neobojeno; Pohabano; Ostalo
hu: Figura felületkezelésének típusa: Fényes; Kézzel festett; Matt; Metál; Gyöngyházfényű; Szatén/félfényes; Festetlen; Koptatott; Egyéb
lt-LT: Figūrėlės apdailos tipas: Blizgus; Dažytas rankomis; Matinis; Metalinis; Perlamutrinis; Satininis / pusiau blizgus; Nedažytas; Sendintas (paveiktas oro sąlygų); Kita
sk-SK: Typ vyhotovenia figuríny: Lesklé; Ručne maľované; Matné; Metalické; Perleťové; Saténové/pololesklé; Nemaľované; S patinou; Iné
pl: Rodzaj wykończenia figury: Błyszczące; Ręcznie malowane; Matowe; Metaliczne; Perłowe; Satynowe/Półmatowe; Niemalowane; Postarzane (weathered); Inne
nl: Figuren afwerking type: Glans; Handgeschilderd; Mat; Metallic; Parelmoer; Zijdeglans/halfglans; Ongeschilderd; Verweerd; Overig
th: ประเภทการตกแต่งรูป: เงา; ทาสีด้วยมือ; เนื้อด้าน; เมทัลลิก; สีมุก; ซาติน/กึ่งเงา; ไม่ทำสี; ทำสีให้ดูเก่า; อื่นๆ
de: Oberflächenfinish der Figur: Glänzend; Handbemalt; Matt; Metallic; Perlglanz; Satin/Halbglänzend; Unbemalt; Verwittert; Sonstige
tr: Şekil bitirme tipi: Parlak; El boyaması; Mat; Metalik; Sedefli; Saten/yarı parlak; Boyasız; Eskitilmiş; Diğer
ja: フィギュア仕上げタイプ: 光沢; 手塗り; マット; メタリック; パール; サテン/半光沢; 未塗装; ウェザリング (汚し塗装); その他
ko: 피규어 마감 유형: 유광; 수작업 페인팅; 무광; 메탈릭; 펄; 반광/새틴; 도색 안 됨; 웨더링; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de acabamento da miniatura: Brilhante; Pintada à mão; Fosco; Metálico; Perolado; Acetinado/Semibrilho; Sem pintura; Envelhecido; Outro
vi: Loại hoàn thiện mô hình: Bóng; Vẽ tay; Mờ; Ánh kim; Ánh ngọc trai; Bóng mờ/bán bóng; Không sơn; Giả cổ/sờn cũ; Khác
en: Figure finish type: Gloss; Hand-painted; Matte; Metallic; Pearlescent; Satin/Semi-gloss; Unpainted; Weathered; Other
sv: Finishtyp för figur: Glansig; Handmålad; Matt; Metallic; Pärlemor; Satin/halvblank; Omålad; Vädrad; Övrigt
zh-TW: 模型表面處理類型: 亮面; 手繪; 霧面; 金屬色; 珠光; 緞面/半亮面; 未上漆; 舊化; 其他
cs: Typ dokončení figurky: Lesklá; Ručně malovaná; Matná; Metalická; Perleťová; Saténová/pololesklá; Nenabarvená; Patinovaná; Jiné
it: Tipo di finitura della statuetta: Lucido; Dipinto a mano; Opaco; Metallizzato; Perlescente; Satinato/semilucido; Non dipinto; Invecchiato; Altro
da: Figurfinishtype: Blank; Håndmalet; Mat; Metallisk; Perlemor; Satin/halvblank; Umalet; Patineret; Andet